Utah statutes.
63G-4-205.   Procedures for formal adjudicative proceedings -- Discovery and
subpoenas.
(1)  In formal adjudicative proceedings, the agency may, by rule, prescribe
means of discovery adequate to permit the parties to obtain all relevant
information necessary to support their claims or defenses.  If the agency does
not enact rules under this section, the parties may conduct discovery
according to the Utah Rules of Civil Procedure.
(2)  Subpoenas and other orders to secure the attendance of witnesses or the
production of evidence in formal adjudicative proceedings shall be issued by
the presiding officer when requested by any party, or may be issued by the
presiding officer on the presiding officer's own motion.
(3)  Nothing in this section restricts or precludes any investigative right or
power given to an agency by another statute.
